Utah statutes.
20A-9-504.    Unaffiliated candidates -- Governor.
(1)  Each unaffiliated candidate for governor shall, before July 1 of the
regular general election year, select a running mate to file as an
unaffiliated candidate for the office of lieutenant governor.
(2)  The unaffiliated lieutenant governor candidate shall, by July 1 of the
regular general election year,  file as an unaffiliated candidate by following
the procedures and requirements of this part.
